en: liver
bg: черен дроб
de: Leber
es: hígado
fr: foie
hr: jetra
it: fegato
pl: wątroba

en: frog legs
bg: жабешки бутчета
de: Froschschenkel
fr: Cuisses de grenouilles
hr: žablji kraci
it: cosce di rana

en: starch, food starch, starches
an: Amelón
ar: نشا
az: Nişasta
ba: Крахмал
be: Крухмал
bg: нишесте, скорбяла, нишестета
bn: স্টার্চ
bs: Škrob
ca: Midó
cs: Škrob
da: stivelse
de: Stärke, Stärken, Speisestärke
el: άμυλο
es: almidón, fecula
et: Tärklis
eu: Almidoi
fa: نشاسته
fi: tärkkelys, tärkkelystä
fr: amidon, fécules, fécule
fy: Stiselmoal
ga: Stáirse
he: עמילן
hi: मंड
hr: škrob
hu: Keményítő
hy: Օսլա
id: Amilum
io: Amilo
is: Sterkja
it: Amido, amidi, fecola
ja: デンプン, でん粉, 澱粉
ka: სახამებელი
kk: Крахмал
ko: 녹말
la: Amylum
li: Zètmael
lt: Krakmolas, tirštiklis krakmolas
lv: Ciete
mk: Скроб
ml: അന്നജം
mn: Цардуул
ms: Kanji
nb: stivelse
nl: zetmeel, zetmelen
nn: Stive
oc: Amidon
pa: ਸਟਾਰਚ
pl: Skrobia, skrobie
pt: amido
qu: Miqu
ro: Amidon
ru: Крахмал
sh: Škrob
sk: Škrob
sl: Škrob
sq: Amidoni
sr: Скроб
su: Aci
sv: stärkelse
sw: Wanga
ta: மாப்பொருள்
th: แป้ง
tl: Gawgaw
tr: Nişasta
tt: Kraxmal
uk: Крохмаль
ur: نشاستہ
uz: Kraxmal
vi: Tinh bột
yi: קראכמל
zh: 淀粉

en: modified starch, modified starches, modified food starch, modified food starches, food starch modified, processed starch
ar: نشا معدل
bg: Модифицирано нишесте, модифицирани нишестета, модифицирана скорбяла, преработено нишесте
ca: Midó modificat, Midons modificats, Fècula modificada, fècules modificades
cs: Modifikovaný škrob
da: modificeret stivelse
de: modifizierte Stärke
el: τροποποιημένο άμυλο
es: almidón modificado, almidones modificados
et: modifitseeritud tärklis. modifitseeritu tärklis
fi: muunnettu tärkkelys, modifioitu tärkkelys, muunneltu tärkkelys
fr: amidon transformé, amidon modifié, amidons modifiés, amidons transformés
ga: Stáirse modhnaithe
he: עמילן מעובד
hr: modificirani škrob, modificiran škrob
hu: Módosított keményítő
is: umbreytt sterkja
it: amido modificato, Amidi modificati
ja: 加工デンプン, 加工でん粉
ko: 가공 전분
lt: modifikuotas krakmolas
lv: Modificēta ciete
mt: Lamtu mmodifikat
nb: modifisert stivelse
nl: gemodificeerd zetmeel, Gemodificeerde zetmelen
pl: modyfikowana skrobia, skrobia modyfikowana, modyfikowane skrobie, skrobie modyfikowane
pt: amido modificado
ro: amidon modificat
ru: Модифицированный крахмал
sk: Modifikovaný škrob
sl: modificiran skrob, modificirani škrob
sv: modifierad stärkelse
th: แป้งดัดแปร
zh: 化製澱粉

en: corn starch, maize starch, cornstarch
ar: نشا الذرة
bg: царевично нишесте
ca: midó de blat de moro
cs: kukuřičný škrob
da: majsstivelse
de: Maisstärke
el: άμυλο αραβοσίτου
eo: maizamelo
es: almidón de maíz, maicena, fecula de maiz
et: maisitärklis
eu: maizena
fa: نشاسته ذرت
fi: maissitärkkelys
fr: amidon de maïs, amidon de mais, fécule de mais
he: עמילן תירס
hr: kukuruzni škrob, kukuruz škrob
hu: kukoricakeményítő
id: tepung jagung
is: maíssterkja
it: amido di mais
ja: コーンスターチ, とうもろこしでん粉
kk: жүгері крахмалы
ko: 옥수수 녹말
lt: kukurūzų krakmolas
lv: kukurūzas ciete
ms: tepung jagung
nb: maisstivelse, maisenna
nl: maïszetmeel, maiszetmeel, maïzena
no: maisstivelse
pl: skrobia kukurydziana, skrobia z kukurydzy
pt: amido de milho
ro: amidon de porumb, amidon din porumb
rs: kukuruzni škrob
ru: кукурузный крахмал, крахмал кукурузный
sk: kukuričný škrob
sl: koruzni škrob, koruza škrob
sr: kukuruzni skrob
sv: stärkelse av majs, majsstärkelse
th: แป้งข้าวโพด
tr: mısır nişastası
uk: кукурудзяний крохмаль
zh: 玉米澱粉

en: non-gmo corn starch
de: GVO-freie Maisstärke
es: maicena no modificada genéticamente, maicena no-gmo, maicena no gmo
fr: amidon de mais sans OGM
hr: ne-gmo kukuruzni škrob

en: waxy maize starch, waxy corn starch
de: Wachsmaisstärke
fr: amidon de maïs cireux
hr: voštani kukuruzni škrob
it: amido di mais ceroso
nl: kleefmaïszetmeel, waxy maiszetmeel, waxy maïszetmeel

en: native corn starch
de: native Maisstärke
fr: amidon de maïs natif, amidon natif de maïs
hr: nativni kukuruzni škrob
it: amido di mais nativo
pl: niemodyfikowana skrobia kukurydziana, skrobia natywna

en: modified corn starch, modified corn starches, modified maize starch, corn starch modified
bg: модифицирано царевично нишесте
ca: Midó de moresc modificat, midó de panís modificat, midó modificat de blat de moro, midó de blat de moro modificat, midons de moresc modificat, midons de panís modificat, midons de blat de moro modificat
cs: Modifikovaný kukuřičný škrob, kukuřičný modifikovaný škrob
da: modificeret majsstivelse
de: modifizierte Maisstärke
el: τροποποιημένο άμυλο αραβοσίτου
es: Almidón modificado de maiz, almidon de maiz modificado, almidones de maiz modificados
et: modifitseeritud maisitärklis
fi: muunnettu maissitärkkelys, modifioitu maissitärkkelys, muunneltu maissitärkkelys, muunnettua maissitärkkelystä
fr: amidon transformé de maïs, amidon de maïs transformé, amidon modifié de maïs, amidon de maïs modifié, amidons modifié de maïs, amidons modifiés de maïs
hr: modificirani kukuruzni škrob, modificirana kukuruzna škrob, kukuruzni modificirani škrob
hu: módosított kukoricakeményítő
is: umbreytt maíssterkja
it: amido modificato di mais, amido di mais modificato
lt: modifikuotas kukurūzų krakmolas
lv: modificēta kukurūzas ciete
nb: modifisert maisstivelse
nl: gemodificeerd maïszetmeel, gemodificeerd maiszetmeel
pl: modyfikowana skrobia kukurydziana, modyfikowana skrobia z kukurydzy, skrobia kukurydziana modyfikowana
pt: amido de milho modificado, amido modificado de milho
ro: amidon modificat din porumb, amidon modificat de porumb
ru: крахмал кукурузный модифицированный
sk: modifikovaný kukuričný škrob, kukuričný modifikovaný škrob
sl: modificiran koruzni škrob
sr: modifikovani kukuruzni skrob
sv: modifierad majsstärkelse
uk: крохмаль модифікований кукурудзяний

en: partially modified corn starch
de: Maisstärke teilweise modifiziert, teilweise modifizierte Maisstärke
fr: amidon de maïs partiellement modifié
hr: djelomično modificirani kukuruzni škrob
it: amido di mais parzialmente modificato

en: modified waxy maize starch
de: modifizierte Wachsmaisstärke
fr: amidon modifié de maïs cireux, amidon de maïs cireux modifié
hr: modificirani voštani kukuruzni škrob
it: amido di mais ceroso modificato

en: modified viscous maize starch
es: almidón de maíz ceroso modificado
fr: amidon modifié de maïs visqueux
hr: modificirani viskozni kukuruzni škrob
it: amido di mais viscoso modificato
nl: gemodificeerd waxy maïszetmeel

en: mung bean starch
hr: škrob mungo graha
it: amido di fagioli mungo
pl: skrobia z fasoli mung

en: potato starch
ar: نشا البطاطا
bg: картофено нишесте, нишесте картофено
ca: fècula de patata, midó de patata
cs: Bramborový škrob
da: kartoffelstivelse, Kartoffelmel
de: Kartoffelstärke, Kartoffelmehl
es: fécula de patata, Almidón de papa, Almidón de patata
et: Kartulitärklis
fi: perunatärkkelys
fr: amidon de pommes de terre, amidon de pomme de terre, fécule de pommes de terre, fécule de pomme de terre
hr: krumpirov škrob, krumpirov skrob
hu: burgonyakeményítő
id: Tepung kentang
is: kartöflusterkja
it: fecola di patate, amido di patata, amido di patate
ja: 片栗粉, じゃがいも澱粉
ko: 감자 녹말
lt: bulvių krakmolas
lv: kartupeļu ciete
ms: kanji kentang
nb: potetstivelse
nl: aardappelzetmeel
nn: potetmjøl
pl: skrobia ziemniaczana
pt: amido de batata, fecula de batata
ro: amidon din cartofi, amidon de cartofi
ru: Картофельный крахмал, крахмал картофельный
sv: potatisstärkelse
uk: Картопляний крохмаль
zh: 太白粉

en: sweet potato starch
de: Süßkartoffelstärke
es: almidón de batata
fr: amidon de patate douce
hr: škrob od slatkog krumpira
it: amido di patate dolci
nl: zoete aardappelzetmeel
pl: skrobia ze słodkich ziemniaków, skrobia z batatów, skrobia ze słodkiego ziemniaka

en: arrowroot powder, arrowroot starch, arrowroot flour
de: Pfeilwurzelstärke, Pfeilwurzelmehl

en: wheat starch
bg: пшенично нишесте, пшеничено нишесте
ca: Midó de blat, fècula de blat
cs: pšeničný škrob
da: Hvedestivelse
de: Weizenstärke
el: άμυλο σιταριού
es: almidón de trigo
et: nisutärklis
fi: vehnätärkkelys, vehnätärkkelystä
fr: amidon de froment, amidon de blé
he: עמילן חיטה
hr: pšenični škrob, pšenica škrob
hu: búzakeményítő
it: amido di frumento
lv: kviešu ciete
nb: hvetestivelse
nl: tarwezetmeel, tarwe zetmeel
pl: Skrobia pszenna
pt: amido de trigo
ro: amidon din grâu
rs: pšenicni škrob
ru: Пшеничный крахмал, крахмал-пшеничный
se: pšenični škrob, pšenični skrob, pšenica škrob
sv: vetestärkelse

en: modified wheat starch
bg: модифицирано пшенично нишесте
ca: midó de blat modificat
de: modifizierte Weizenstärke
es: almidón de trigo modificado
fi: muunnettu vehnätärkkelys, muunneltu vehnätärkkelys
fr: amidon modifié de blé, amidon transformé de blé
hr: modificirani pšenični škrob
hu: módosított búzakeményítő
it: amido modificato di fromento
nl: gemodificeerd tarwezetmeel
sv: modifierad vetestärkelse

en: partially modified wheat starch
de: teilweise modifizierte Weizenstärke, Weizenstärke teilweise modifiziert
fr: amidon de blé partiellement modifié
hr: djelomično modificirani pšenični škrob
it: amido di frumento parzialmente modificato

en: fermented wheat starch
hr: fermentirani pšenični škrob
it: amido di frumento fermentato
nl: gefermenteerde tarwezetmeel